Utah statutes.
63C-9-102.   Definitions.
(1)  "Board" means the State Capitol Preservation Board created by Section
63C-9-201.
(2)  "Capitol hill complex" means the grounds, monuments, parking areas,
buildings, including the capitol, and other man-made and natural objects
within the area bounded by 300 North Street, Columbus Street, 500 North
Street, and East Capitol Boulevard, and includes:
(a)  the White Community Memorial Chapel and its grounds and parking areas,
and the Council Hall Travel Information Center building and its grounds and
parking areas;
(b)  the Daughters of the Utah Pioneers building and its grounds and parking
areas and other state-owned property included within the area bounded by
Columbus Street, North Main Street, and Apricot Avenue;
(c)  the state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus
Street, Wall Street, and 400 North Street; and
(d)  the state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus
Street, West Capitol Street, and 500 North Street.
(3)  "Capitol hill facilities" means all of the buildings on the capitol hill
complex, including the capitol, and the exterior steps, entrances, streets,
parking areas, and other paved areas of capitol hill.
(4)  "Capitol hill grounds" means the unpaved areas of the capitol hill
complex.
(5)  "Executive director" means the executive director appointed by the board
under Section 63C-9-401.
